Tennessee, session 114, SB0203.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-4-225(a), is amended by adding
the following at the end of the subsection:
The application and proof may be submitted electronically, by mail, or in person.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0203
000128
- 1 -